old/toy.foma
define teDropping "–"  -> 0 || V ("*") ("*") MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _          ∘
                  t e "*" "*" -> l || _ MorphemeBoundary "@*"                              ∘  ! for strongly special te's
				  t e         -> s || V _ MorphemeBoundary ("@*") "@₂" MorphPhonSymbols* k ,, ! for postbases that begin with velars
				  t e ("*")   -> t || V _ MorphemeBoundary ("@*") "@₂" MorphPhonSymbols* k ,, 
				  t e "*"     -> l || _ MorphemeBoundary "@*"                              ,, ! for weakly special te's
				  t e "*"     -> s || _ MorphemeBoundary "@*"                              ∘
				  "*" ("*")   -> 0 || t e _ MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols*             ∘
				  l gh -> ll ghh || t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" _                            ∘ ! for postbase @–lghii
                  [..] -> e      || C t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" ll _ ghh                   ∘
                  [..] -> n e gh || t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* ng h _     ∘ ! for postbase @–nghite
                  ng h -> 0      || t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* _ n e gh   ∘ 
				  t e  -> s    || _ MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* i              ∘ ! for postbases that begin with i 
                  [..] -> ll   || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* _ l        ∘ ! for postbases that begin with apicals
                  l    -> 0    || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* ll _       ∘
                  [..] -> nn   || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* _ n        ∘
                  n    -> 0    || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* nn _       ∘
				  [..] -> rr   || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* _ r        ∘
                  r    -> 0    || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* rr _       ∘
				  [..] -> s    || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* _ [y | z]  ∘
                  y    -> 0    || V t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* s _        ∘
				  e    -> 0    || V t _ MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* [ m | v ]  ∘ ! for postbases that begin with labials
				  v    -> f    || C t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* _          ∘
                  g    -> gg   || _ t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* [l | m | n | r | v | y | z]  ∘
                  gh   -> ghh  || _ t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* [l | m | n | r | v | y | z]  ∘
                  ghw  -> ghhw || _ t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* [l | m | n | r | v | y | z]  ∘
                  l    -> ll   || _ t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* [l | m | n | r | v | y | z]  ∘
                  r    -> rr   || _ t e MorphemeBoundary "@₁" MorphPhonSymbols* [l | m | n | r | v | y | z]  ∘
                  t e  -> 0    || _ MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* "@₁"                ∘ ! drop base-final te
				  "@*" -> 0, 
                  "@₁" -> 0,
				  "@₂" -> 0    || WordBoundary Alphabet* MorphemeBoundary (MorphPhonSymbols*)  _  ;

define AlternativeForms "~f-w/-w" ->      "-w" || WordBoundary (C) V C (C) V (C)  MorphemeBoundary _  ∘
                        "~f-w/-w" -> "~f" "-w"                                                        ∘
						"~sf-w:(e)tgun/teggun" -> t e gg u n || [ gh "*" | g ] MorphemeBoundary _  ,, 
						"~sf-w:(e)tgun/teggun" -> "~sf" "-w" ":" "(e)" t g u n                     ∘
                        "@₁–lghii/@*ngugh*" -> "@₁" "–" l gh i i MorphemeBoundary || [Alphabet - "*"] MorphemeBoundary _  ,,
                        "@₁–lghii/@*ngugh*" -> "@*" ng u gh "*" MorphemeBoundary  || "*" MorphemeBoundary _               ∘             
                        "@₁~fy/~f(ng₁)" -> "~f" "(ng₁)" MorphemeBoundary || V ("*") MorphemeBoundary _                    ,,  
                        "@₁~fy/~f(ng₁)" -> "@₁" "~f" y  MorphemeBoundary || [ C | V ] ("*") MorphemeBoundary _            ∘
                        "@₁" "–" ng h i t e "*" "*" MorphemeBoundary "@₁~flu/na" k u    -> MorphemeBoundary "–" g p e n a a n        ∘
                        "@₁" "–" ng h i t e "*" "*" MorphemeBoundary "@₁~flu/na" t e n  -> MorphemeBoundary "–" g p e n a ng         ∘
                        "@₁" "–" ng h i t e "*" "*" MorphemeBoundary "@₁~flu/na" t a    -> MorphemeBoundary "–" g p e n a a m t a    ∘
                        "@₁" "–" ng h i t e "*" "*" MorphemeBoundary "@₁~flu/na" t u ng -> MorphemeBoundary "–" g p e n a a m t u ng ∘
                        "@₁" "–" ng h i t e "*" "*" MorphemeBoundary "@₁~flu/na"        -> MorphemeBoundary "–" g p e n a            ∘
                      "~" ":" "(ng₁)" i t e "*" "*" MorphemeBoundary "@₁~flu/na" k u   -> MorphemeBoundary "~f" "–" ng u n a a n         ∘
                      "~" ":" "(ng₁)" i t e "*" "*" MorphemeBoundary "@₁~flu/na" t e n -> MorphemeBoundary "~f" "–" ng u n a ng          ∘
                      "~" ":" "(ng₁)" i t e "*" "*" MorphemeBoundary "@₁~flu/na" t a   -> MorphemeBoundary "~f" "–" ng u n a a m t a     ∘
                      "~" ":" "(ng₁)" i t e "*" "*" MorphemeBoundary "@₁~flu/na" t u ng -> MorphemeBoundary "~f" "–" ng u n a a m t u ng ∘
                      "~" ":" "(ng₁)" i t e "*" "*" MorphemeBoundary "@₁~flu/na"  -> MorphemeBoundary "~f" "–" ng u n a                  ∘
                        "@₁~flu/na" k u -> n a a n            || t e "*" MorphemeBoundary _  ∘
                        "@₁~flu/na" t e n -> n a ng           || t e "*" MorphemeBoundary _  ∘
                        "@₁~flu/na" t a -> n a a m t a        || t e "*" MorphemeBoundary _  ∘
                        "@₁~flu/na" t u ng  -> n a a m t u ng || t e "*" MorphemeBoundary _  ∘
                        "@₁~flu/na" -> "@₁" "~f" l u                                         ;

define JunctureGraphemeInsertion ["(g/t)" | "(g₁)"] -> g || V V MorphemeBoundary [("~f") | ("~")] _            ∘
                                 ["(g/t)" | "(t)"] -> t  ||   C MorphemeBoundary ("~f") _                      ∘
                                 "(ng₁)" -> "ng"         ||   V ("*") MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _     ∘
                                 "(s/z)" -> s || C ("*") MorphemeBoundary _  ∘
                                 "(s/z)" -> z || V       MorphemeBoundary _  ∘                                 
                                 "(p/v)" -> p || C ("*") MorphemeBoundary _  ∘
                                 "(p/v)" -> v || V       MorphemeBoundary _  ∘
                                 "(t/y)" -> t || C ("*") MorphemeBoundary _  ∘
                                 "(t/y)" -> y || V       MorphemeBoundary _  ∘
								 "(pete)fte" -> p e t e f t e MorphemeBoundary || C ("*") _  ,,
								 "(pete)fte" -> p e t e       MorphemeBoundary || C ("*") _  ∘ 
								 "(pete)fte" -> f t e         MorphemeBoundary || V       _  ∘
								 "(g₂)"  -> g    || [Alphabet - t] e MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _       ∘
                                 "(g₃)"  -> g    || e MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _                      ∘
								 "(te)"  -> t e  || C ("*") _                                                   ∘
								 "(te)"  -> 0    || V       _                                                   ∘
								 "(i₁)"  -> i    || e MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _                      ∘
								 "(i₂)"  -> i    || [Alphabet - t] e MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _       ∘
								 "(i/u)" -> i    || t e MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _                    ∘
								 "(i/u)" -> u    || [Alphabet - t] e MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _       ∘
								 "(i/u)" -> u    || [Alphabet - FullVowel] MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _ ∘
								 "(u)"   -> u    || [Alphabet - FullVowel] MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _ ∘
								 "(ng₂)" -> "ng" || FullVowel MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _              ∘
								 "(a)" e -> a    || _ MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* ng                     ∘
								 i "(i/e)" -> e  || m _ t                                                       ∘
								 i "(i/e)" -> i  || n _ t                                                       ∘
    		                     "(g/t)" -> 0,
								 "(g₁)"  -> 0,
								 "(g₂)"  -> 0,
								 "(g₃)"  -> 0,
								 "(t)"   -> 0,
								 "(ng₁)" -> 0,
								 "(s/z)" -> 0,
								 "(p/v)" -> 0,
								 "(t/y)" -> 0,
								 "(i₁)"  -> 0,
								 "(i₂)"  -> 0,
								 "(i/u)" -> 0,
								 "(u)"   -> 0,
								 "(ng₂)" -> 0,
							     "(a)"   -> 0	 || WordBoundary Alphabet* MorphemeBoundary (MorphPhonSymbols*) _  ;

define UvularDropping gh MorphemeBoundary ":" e -> a MorphemeBoundary || [ WordBoundary | C ] a _ ∘
                      gh MorphemeBoundary ":" e -> i MorphemeBoundary || [ WordBoundary | C ] i _ ∘
                      gh MorphemeBoundary ":" e -> u MorphemeBoundary || [ WordBoundary | C ] u _ ∘
                      gh MorphemeBoundary ":" a -> a MorphemeBoundary || [ WordBoundary | C ] FullVowel _ ∘
                      gh MorphemeBoundary ":" i -> i MorphemeBoundary || [ WordBoundary | C ] FullVowel _ ∘
                      gh MorphemeBoundary ":" u -> u MorphemeBoundary || [ WordBoundary | C ] FullVowel _ ∘
                                                           ":"   -> 0 || WordBoundary Alphabet* MorphemeBoundary _ ;

define VelarUvularRounding k -> kw, g -> w, gg -> wh, ng -> ngw, ngng -> ngngw || [C|V - u] _ u (MorphemeBoundary) i (MorphemeBoundary)  ∘
                           k -> kw, g -> w, gg -> wh, ng -> ngw, ngng -> ngngw || [C|V - u] _ u (MorphemeBoundary) a (MorphemeBoundary)  ∘
                                     h -> h w, q -> qw, gh -> ghw, ghh -> ghhw || [C|V - u] _ u (MorphemeBoundary) i (MorphemeBoundary)  ∘
                                     h -> h w, q -> qw, gh -> ghw, ghh -> ghhw || [C|V - u] _ u (MorphemeBoundary) a (MorphemeBoundary)  ;
							                         !["(g/t)" | "(g)"] -> w || a u MorphemeBoundary MorphemeBoundary MorphPhonSymbols* _ ;

define TripleVowelCluster V -> 0 || V _ V ;  ! delete the middle vowel in a cluster of three vowels

define VowelDominance a i -> i i  ∘
                      i a -> i i  ∘
                      u i -> i i  ∘
                      i u -> i i  ∘
                      a u -> a a  ∘
                      u a -> a a  ∘
					  e i -> i    ;

define MultipleForms "[Opt_PRS_2Sg]" -> g i     || V V  _                  ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg]" -> "~sf" i || [C - gh] _              ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg]" -> "~sf" i || [e | DoubleVowel] gh _  ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg]" -> n       || t e _                   ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg]" -> "~f" i  || [C - t] e _             ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg]" -> ":" a   || FullVowel gh _          ∘
					 "[Opt_PRS_2Sg]" -> 0                                  ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg_3Sg]" -> "~f" "(i₁)" g u  || V _        ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg_3Sg]" -> "~sf" "–" ghh u || [ q | gh | ghh | qw | ghw | ghhw ] _  ∘
					 "[Opt_FUT_Intr]" -> "@₁" "–" l gh a || V  _           ∘
					 "[Opt_FUT_Intr]" -> "~sf" "–" ghh a || gh _           ∘
					 "[Opt_FUT_Intr]" -> "~sf" "–" gg a  || g  _           ∘
                     "[Opt_PRS_2Sg_3Sg]" -> "~sf" "–" gg u  || C _         ∘
					 "[To_Feel_R_Toward]" ->       "~" "–" k e || V _      ∘
					 "[To_Feel_R_Toward]" -> "@₁" "~f" y u k e || C _      ;


!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!                          !!!
!!!      Clean-Up Rules      !!!
!!!                          !!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
